Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-105 Lodge system. (a) A
society is operating on the lodge system if it has a supreme governing body and
subordinate lodges into which members are elected, initiated or admitted in
accordance with its laws, rules and ritual. Subordinate lodges shall be
required by the laws of the society to hold regular meetings at least once in
each month in furtherance of the purposes of the society.

(b) A society may, at its option, organize and
operate lodges for children under the minimum age for adult membership.
Membership and initiation in local lodges shall not be required of such
children, nor shall they have a voice or vote in the management of the society.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next